Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3109
Policy; issued; membership fee.

Any professional association mutual insurance company may collect, at the time a policy is issued, a membership fee. Such fee shall be in addition to any premium charged for insurance and shall be paid into the company's surplus.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 9.